nl: Verzamelkaart league: ATP; Cricket (ICC); FIFA; Formule 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olympische Spelen; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Overig
lt-LT: Prekybos kortelių lyga: ATP; Kriketas (ICC); FIFA; Formulė 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olimpinės žaidynės; PGA; Regbis („World Rugby“); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Kita
en: Trading card league: ATP; Cricket (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olympics; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Other
it: Lega delle carte collezionabili: ATP; Cricket (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olimpiadi; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Altro
ru: Лига коллекционных карточек: ATP; Крикет (ICC); FIFA; Формула-1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Олимпийские игры; PGA; Регби (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Другое
hr-HR: Liga trgovanja karticama: ATP; Kriket (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olimpijske igre; PGA; Ragbi (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Ostalo
ja: トレーディングカードリーグ: ATP; クリケット (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; オリンピック; PGA; ラグビー (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; その他
da: Liga for samlekort: ATP; Cricket (ICC); FIFA; Formel 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; OL; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Andet
vi: Giải đấu thẻ giao dịch: ATP; Cricket (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olympic; PGA; Bóng bầu dục (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Khác
pt-PT: Liga do cartão colecionável: ATP; Críquete (ICC); FIFA; Fórmula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Jogos Olímpicos; PGA; Râguebi (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Outro
es: Liga de tarjetas coleccionables: ATP; Críquet (ICC); FIFA; Fórmula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Juegos Olímpicos; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Otra
tr: Koleksiyon kartı ligi: ATP; Kriket (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olimpiyatlar; PGA; Ragbi (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Diğer
sl-SI: Liga zbiranja kartic: ATP; Kriket (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olimpijske igre; PGA; Ragbi (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Drugo
cs: Liga sběratelských karet: ATP; Kriket (ICC); FIFA; Formule 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olympijské hry; PGA; Ragby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Jiné
sk-SK: Liga obchodných kariet: ATP; Kriket (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olympijské hry; PGA; Ragby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Iné
zh-TW: 收藏卡片聯盟: ATP; 板球 (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; 奧運; PGA; 橄欖球 (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; 其他
ko: 트레이딩 카드 리그: ATP; 크리켓(ICC); FIFA; 포뮬러 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; 올림픽; PGA; 럭비(월드 럭비); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; 기타
pl: Liga kart kolekcjonerskich: ATP; Krykiet (ICC); FIFA; Formuła 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Igrzyska Olimpijskie; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Inne
nb: Samlekortliga: ATP; Cricket (ICC); FIFA; Formel 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; OL; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Annet
sv: Samlarkort – liga: ATP; Cricket (ICC); FIFA; Formel 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; OS; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Övrigt
zh-CN: 集换式卡牌联盟: ATP; 板球（ICC）; FIFA; 一级方程式赛车; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; 奥运会; PGA; 橄榄球（World Rugby）; UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; 其他
bg-BG: Лига на търговските (колекционерски) карти: ATP; Крикет (ICC); FIFA; Формула 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Олимпийски игри; PGA; Ръгби (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Друго
th: ลีกการซื้อขาย: ATP; คริกเก็ต (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; โอลิมปิก; PGA; รักบี้ (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; อื่นๆ
el: Διοργάνωση σχετική με τις κάρτες προς συλλογή: ATP; Κρίκετ (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Ολυμπιακοί Αγώνες; PGA; Ράγκμπι (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Άλλο
hu: Gyűjtögetős kártya liga: ATP; Krikett (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olimpia; PGA; Rögbi (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Egyéb
fi: Keräilykortin liiga: ATP; Kriketti (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olympialaiset; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Muu
ro-RO: Liga cartonașelor de schimb: ATP; Crichet (ICC); FIFA; Formula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Jocuri Olimpice; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Altele
fr: Ligue des cartes à collectionner: ATP; Cricket (ICC); FIFA; Formule 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Jeux olympiques; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Autre
pt-BR: Cartas colecionáveis liga: ATP; Críquete (ICC); FIFA; Fórmula 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olimpíadas; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Outro
de: Liga der Sammelkarte: ATP; Cricket (ICC); FIFA; Formel 1; LPGA; MLB; MLS; NBA; NCAA; NFL; NHL; Olympische Spiele; PGA; Rugby (World Rugby); UEFA; UFC; WNBA; WTA; WWE; Sonstige